Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-785
Compliance; not required.

Compliance with sections 31-781 to 31-784 shall not be required for annexation of a sanitary and improvement district. Failure to comply with such sections shall not serve as the basis for the invalidation of an otherwise lawful annexation of a district by a city or village.

Laws 1993, LB 210, § 5.